Mississippi, session 2026, SB2610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Subject to approval by the Board of Trustees of the State Institutions of Higher Learning and upon the retirement of Willie L. Simmons as a member of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, the Alcorn State University Biotechnology Building, located at 1000 ASU Drive in Lorman, Jefferson County, Mississippi, shall be renamed the "Willie L. Simmons Biotechnology Building."  At such time, the Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the building, that states the background, accomplishments and service of Willie L. Simmons to Alcorn State University and to the State of Mississippi.  Additionally, the Department of Finance and Administration, in conjunction with Alcorn State University, shall erect or cause to be erected, at the time of renaming, proper lettering or signage on the outdoor facade of the building displaying the official name of the building as the "Willie L. Simmons Biotechnology Building." SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.